Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2702
Money received; disposition.

Every judge or clerk of court, upon receiving any money on account of forfeited recognizances, fines, or costs accruing or due to the county or state, shall pay the same to the treasurer of the proper county, except as may be otherwise expressly provided, within thirty days from the time of receiving the same. When any money is paid to a judge or clerk of court on account of costs due to individual persons, the same shall be paid to the persons to whom the same are due upon demand.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 534, p. 840;

R.S.1913, § 9238;

C.S.1922, § 10267;

Laws 1927, c. 62, § 1, p. 223;

C.S.1929, § 29-2702;

R.S.1943, § 29-2702;

Laws 1973, LB 226, § 19;

Laws 1988, LB 370, § 8;

Laws 2020, LB1028, § 6.

This section recognizes the constitutional requirement for disposition of fines, penalties, and license money. School Dist. No. 54 v. School Dist. of Omaha, 171 Neb. 769, 107 N.W.2d 744 (1961).

Where clerk of district court deposits money received from payment of fines in bank to his own individual credit, he thereby converts money to his own use. State ex rel. Broatch v. Moores, 56 Neb. 1, 76 N.W. 530 (1898).